Hawaii statutes.
[§710-1078] Disrespect of a house of the
legislature. (1) A person who is not a member of either house of the
legislature commits the offense of disrespect of a house of the legislature if,
while the person is present at a legislative session of either house or at a
hearing of any committee of either house, the person creates a breach of peace
or disturbance with intent to interrupt the proceeding.

(2) Whenever there is probable cause to
believe that a person has violated subsection (1), the person shall be subject
to arrest and removal from the presence of the legislature or either house or
any committee of a house, by the sergeant-at-arms of the affected house or by
any other law enforcement officer of the State, as directed by the
sergeant-at-arms.

(3) Disrespect of a house of the legislature
is a petty misdemeanor. [L 2012, c 204, §1]

COMMENTARY ON §710-1078

Act 204, Session Laws 2012, added this section to
establish the petty misdemeanor offense of disrespect of a house of the
legislature. While instances of contemptuous behavior are rare, the
legislature believed that the law needed to be updated to address such possible
behavior that can occur at any time. Senate Standing Committee Report No.
2998.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next